Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1799.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 462A.37, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Authorization. (a) The agency may issue up to $30,000,000 in aggregate principal amount of housing infrastructure bonds in one or more series to which the payment made under this section may be pledged. The housing infrastructure bonds authorized in this subdivision may be issued to fund loans, or grants for the purposes of clauses (4) and (7), on terms and conditions the agency deems appropriate, made for one or more of the following purposes: (1) to finance the costs of the construction, acquisition,new text begin adaptive reuse,new text end and rehabilitation of supportive housing where at least 50 percent of units are set aside for individuals and families who are without a permanent residence; (2) to finance the costs of the acquisition and rehabilitation of foreclosed or abandoned housing to be used for affordable rental housing or for affordable home ownership and the costs of new construction of rental housing on abandoned or foreclosed property where the existing structures will be demolished or removed; (3) to finance that portion of the costs of acquisition of property that is attributable to the land to be leased by community land trusts to low- and moderate-income home buyers; (4) to finance the acquisition, improvement, and infrastructure of manufactured home parks under section 462A.2035, subdivision 1b; (5) to finance the costs of acquisition, rehabilitation, adaptive reuse, or new construction of senior housing; (6) to finance the costs of acquisition, rehabilitation, and replacement of federally assisted rental housing and for the refinancing of costs of the construction, acquisition, and rehabilitation of federally assisted rental housing, including providing funds to refund, in whole or in part, outstanding bonds previously issued by the agency or another government unit to finance or refinance such costs; (7) to finance the costs of acquisition, rehabilitation, adaptive reuse, or new construction of single-family housing; (8) to finance the costs of construction, acquisition,new text begin adaptive reuse,new text end and rehabilitation of permanent housing that is affordable to households with incomes at or below 50 percent of the area median income for the applicable county or metropolitan area as published by the Department of Housing and Urban Development, as adjusted for household size; and (9) to finance the costs of construction, acquisition, rehabilitation, conversion, and development of cooperatively owned housing created under chapter 308A, 308B, or 308C that is affordable to low- and moderate-income households. (b) Among comparable proposals for permanent supportive housing, preference shall be given to permanent supportive housing for veterans and other individuals or families who: (1) either have been without a permanent residence for at least 12 months or at least four times in the last three years; or (2) are at significant risk of lacking a permanent residence for 12 months or at least four times in the last three years. (c) Among comparable proposals for senior housing, the agency must give priority to requests for projects that: (1) demonstrate a commitment to maintaining the housing financed as affordable to senior households; (2) leverage other sources of funding to finance the project, including the use of low-income housing tax credits; (3) provide access to services to residents and demonstrate the ability to increase physical supports and support services as residents age and experience increasing levels of disability; and (4) include households with incomes that do not exceed 30 percent of the median household income for the metropolitan area. (d) To the extent practicable, the agency shall balance the loans made between projects in the metropolitan area and projects outside the metropolitan area. Of the loans made to projects outside the metropolitan area, the agency shall, to the extent practicable, balance the loans made between projects in counties or cities with a population of 20,000 or less, as established by the most recent decennial census, and projects in counties or cities with populations in excess of 20,000. (e) Among comparable proposals for permanent housing, the agency must give preference to projects that will provide housing that is affordable to households at or below 30 percent of the area median income. (f) If a loan recipient uses the loan for new construction as defined by the agency on a building containing more than four units, the loan recipient must construct, convert, or otherwise adapt the building to include: (1) the greater of: (i) at least one unit; or (ii) at least five percent of units that are accessible units, and each accessible unit includes at least one roll-in shower, water closet, and kitchen work surface meeting the requirements of section 1002 of the current State Building Code Accessibility Provisions for Dwelling Units in Minnesota; and (2) the greater of: (i) at least one unit; or (ii) at least five percent of units that are sensory-accessible units that include: (A) soundproofing between shared walls for first and second floor units; (B) no florescent lighting in units and common areas; (C) low-fume paint; (D) low-chemical carpet; and (E) low-chemical carpet glue in units and common areas. Nothing in this paragraph relieves a project funded by the agency from meeting other applicable accessibility requirements.